California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) In no event shall the reduction of any maximum aid payment level pursuant to this section result in a change in share of cost or eligibility for services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) for any aged, blind, or disabled person who was receiving services under that article in 1994 prior to the enactment of this section because of that reduction in maximum aid payment, provided he or she continues to meet other applicable requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 18.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.019.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum aid payments in effect on January 1, 2009, in accordance with Article 5 of Chapter 3 of Division 9, except payments made pursuant to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200, shall be reduced to the payment levels in effect on December 1, 2008, and shall be further reduced by 2.3 percent.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall the payment schedules be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 13, Sec. 6.   Effective February 20, 2009.   Section operative July 1, 2009, by its own provisions.   Note: The addition of this section was not terminated by Sec. 11 of Ch. 13 because the conditions failed.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.02.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (b), on the first day of the month following 90 days after enactment of the act that adds this section:

(1) The maximum aid payment for a married couple, in accordance with Section 12200, shall be reduced to equal the minimum amount required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) (A) The maximum aid payment under this article for an individual, in accordance with Section 12200, shall be reduced by 0.6 percent.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in no event shall payments under this paragraph be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the reductions required by this section shall not apply to payments made pursuant to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 25.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

12200.03.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and subject to subdivision (b), on the first day of the first month following 90 days after the effective date of the act that adds this section, the maximum aid payment for an individual, as specified in Section 12200, except subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of that section, shall be reduced to equal the minimum amount required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall the payment schedules be reduced below the level of the
 state’s March 1983 payment standards, as adjusted by the federal Social Security Administration, pursuant to Section 416.2096(b) of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 32, Sec. 59.   (AB 106)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the payment schedules set forth in Section 12200 shall be adjusted annually to reflect any increases or decreases in the cost of living. Except as provided in subdivision (e), (f), or (g), these adjustments shall become effective January 1 of each year. The cost-of-living adjustment shall be based on the changes in the California Necessities Index, which as used in this section shall be the weighted average of changes for food, clothing, fuel, utilities, rent, and transportation for low-income consumers. The computation of annual adjustments in the California Necessities Index shall be made in accordance with the following steps:

(1) The base period expenditure amounts for each expenditure category within the California
 Necessities Index used to compute the annual grant adjustment are:Food$ 3,027Clothing (apparel and upkeep)406Fuel and other utilities529Rent, residential4,883Transportation1,757Total$10,602(2) Based on the appropriate components of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, the percentage change shall be determined for the 12-month period which ends 12 months prior to the January in which the cost-of-living adjustment will take effect, for each expenditure category specified in paragraph (1) within the following geographical areas: Los Angeles-Long Beach-Anaheim, San Francisco-Oakland, San Diego, and, to the extent statistically valid information is available from the Bureau of Labor Statistics, additional geographical areas within the state which include not less than 80 percent of recipients of aid under this chapter.

(3) Calculate a weighted percentage change for each of the expenditure categories specified in paragraph (1) using the applicable weighting factors for each area used
 by the Department of Industrial Relations to calculate the California Consumer Price Index (CCPI).

(4) Calculate a category adjustment factor for each expenditure category in paragraph (1) by (1) adding 100 to the applicable weighted percentage change as determined in paragraph (2) and (2) dividing the sum by 100.

(5) Determine the expenditure amounts for the current year by multiplying each expenditure amount determined for the prior year by the applicable category adjustment factor determined in paragraph (4).

(6) Determine the overall adjustment factor by dividing (1) the sum of the expenditure amounts as determined in paragraph (4) for the current year by (2) the sum of the expenditure amounts as determined in paragraph (4) for the prior year.

(b) The overall adjustment factor determined by the preceding computational steps shall be multiplied by the payment schedules established pursuant to Section 12200 as are in effect during the month of December preceding the calendar year in which the adjustments are to occur, and the product rounded to the nearest dollar. The resultant amounts shall constitute the new schedules for the categories given under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 12200, and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The amount as set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 12200 shall be adjusted annually pursuant to this section in the event that the secretary agrees to administer payment under that subdivision. The payment schedule for subdivision (i) of Section 12200 shall be computed as specified, based on the new payment schedules for subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 12200.

(c) The department shall adjust any
 amounts of aid under this chapter to ensure that the minimum level required by the Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for funds under Title XIX of that act is met.

(d) (1) No adjustment shall be made under this section for the 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 1998, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, and 2010 calendar years to reflect any change in the cost of living. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of Section 12201.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.

(2) Any cost-of-living adjustment granted under this section for any calendar year shall not include adjustments for any calendar year in which the cost-of-living adjustment was suspended pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) For
 the 2003 calendar year, the adjustment required by this section shall become effective June 1, 2003.

(f) For the 2005 calendar year, the adjustment required by this section shall become effective April 1, 2005.

(g) (1) For the 2011 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, no adjustment shall be made under this section unless otherwise specified by statute.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the pass along of federal benefits provided for in Section 12201.05 shall be effective on January 1 of each calendar year.

(h) (1) On or before January 10, 2025, and annually thereafter, the department shall provide a display in
 writing, in the department’s Local Assistance Estimates Binder, and on the department’s internet website.

(2) The display shall show both of the following:

(A) The Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment grant amount for individuals compared to the most updated fair market rent amounts for a studio apartment in each of the 58 counties.

(B) The amount remaining after paying rent and indicate the fair market rent as a percentage of the grant for each county.

(3) The department shall update the display at the annual May Revision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 41.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.01.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, the payment schedules set forth in Section 12200 shall be adjusted annually to reflect any increases or decreases in the cost of living, and these adjustments shall become effective January 1 of each year. The annual cost-of-living adjustment shall be based on the increase in the California Necessities Index for the year in which the adjustment becomes effective.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act, the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to subdivision (a), commencing on or after July 1, 2022, and for each year thereafter, shall be 0 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 31.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.03.

(a) For the 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, and 1998 calendar years, or for the period of January 1, 2003, to May 31, 2003, inclusive, if no cost-of-living adjustment is made pursuant to Section 12201, the payment schedules set forth in Sections 12200, 13920, and 13921, as adjusted pursuant to Section 12201, shall include the pass along of any cost-of-living increases in federal benefits under Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 12201, any adjustments made pursuant to this section to reflect the pass along of federal cost-of-living adjustments shall be included in the base amounts for purposes of determining cost-of-living adjustments made pursuant to Section 12201.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no pass along of any cost-of-living increase in federal benefits under Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code shall be made in 1994. This provision shall not apply to those persons receiving payments pursuant to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in no event shall the payment schedules be reduced below the level required by the federal Social Security Act in order to maintain eligibility for federal funding under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, contained in Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (c), for the 2006 calendar year, the pass along of any cost-of-living increase in federal benefits under Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code shall not become effective until April 1, 2006. This subdivision shall not apply to those persons receiving payments pursuant to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 75, Sec. 33.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.04.

On January 1, 1999, in addition to the changes in the payment schedules in Section 12200 required by Section 12201, the payment schedules in Section 12200 shall be increased by an additional 1 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 24.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.05.

(a) Commencing with the 2004 calendar year, and thereafter, in any calendar year in which no cost-of-living adjustment is made pursuant to Section 12201, the payment schedules set forth in Sections 12200, 13920, and 13921, as adjusted pursuant to Section 12201, shall include the pass along of any cost-of-living increases in federal benefits under Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, except that for the 2006 calendar year, the federal pass along shall not become effective until April 1, 2006. This delay shall not apply to those persons receiving payments pursuant to subdivisions (e), (g), and (h) of Section 12200.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 12201, any adjustments made pursuant to this section to reflect the pass-along of federal cost-of-living adjustments shall be included in the base amounts for purposes of determining cost-of-living adjustments made pursuant to Section 12201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 75, Sec. 34.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.06.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2017, the amount of aid paid pursuant to this article, in effect on December 31, 2016, less the federal benefit portion received under Part A of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, shall be increased by 2.76 percent.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2022, the amount of aid paid pursuant to this article, in effect on December 31, 2021, less the federal benefit portion received under Part A of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, shall be increased by a percent increase, as determined by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance that can be accomplished with two hundred ninety-one million two hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars ($291,287,000).

(2) The State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Assembly and Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Human Services policy committees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the final percent increase effectuated by the appropriation included in the Budget Act of 2021 for the purposes of implementing paragraph (1) 30 days prior to notifying the federal Social Security Administration to operationalize the grant increase in this subdivision.

(3) Subject to an appropriation in the Budget Act of 2022, commencing January 1, 2023, the amount of aid paid pursuant to this article, in effect on December 31, 2022, less the federal benefit portion received under Part A of Title XVI of the federal
 Social Security Act, shall be increased by a percent increase, as determined by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance.

(4) The State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Assembly and Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Human Services policy committees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the final percent increase effectuated by the appropriation included in the Budget Act of 2022 for the purposes of implementing paragraph (3) 30 days before notifying the federal Social Security Administration to operationalize the grant increase in this subdivision.

(c) (1) Subject to an appropriation in the Budget Act of 2023, commencing January 1, 2024, the amount
 of aid paid pursuant to this article, in effect on December 31, 2023, less the federal benefit portion received under Part A of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, shall be increased by a percent increase, as determined by the State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance.

(2) The State Department of Social Services and the Department of Finance shall provide a notice to the Assembly and Senate Health and Human Services budget subcommittees, Assembly and Senate Human Services policy committees, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office of the final percent increase effectuated by the appropriation included in the Budget Act of 2023 for the purposes of implementing paragraph (1) 30 days before notifying the federal Social Security Administration to operationalize the grant increase in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 54.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12200, the amount applicable under that section to a disabled minor residing in a nonmedical out-of-home facility with a nonrelative guardian shall be the amount specified in subdivision (g) of that section, as adjusted for cost of living pursuant to Section 12201, except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 12201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

12201.7.

(a) The department shall issue a one-time increase in the amount of six hundred dollars ($600) to a payment received under this chapter as of the eligibility date to be determined by the department.

(b) The one-time increase to a payment made pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the administration provisions pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 12100) and shall be administered in the form and manner determined by the department.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or
 make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 15, Sec. 6.   (SB 86)   Effective April 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

The policy shall be followed of granting aid to the recipient in his own home or in some other suitable home of his own choosing in preference to placing him in an institution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

If, when, and during such times as the United States government authorizes after October 1972, an increase in the adjusted payment level, for whatever reason, above the adjusted payment level under the appropriate approved plan of this state as in effect for January 1972 under Section 401 of Title IV of the Social Security Act Amendments of 1972, the maximum grants of aid provided in Section 12200 shall be increased by an amount equal to 50 percent of such increase in the adjusted payment level, or any higher amount of such increase in the adjusted payment level as is required by federal law. The increase to the grants provided by this section shall be in addition to any increases provided pursuant to Section 12201 or any other provisions of law.

An increase in the adjusted payment level provided in this section includes, but is not limited to, increases, if any, as a result of Public Law 93-86 and increases as a result of the adjusted payment level being based upon the appropriate approved plan of this state as in effect for any date on and after January 1, 1972.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

State supplementary payments under Section 1616 of the Social Security Act shall include payment to recipients as required by Section 212 of Public Law 93-66. In the event that such payment to any such recipient is less than the amount he would otherwise be entitled to receive under this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12500) of this part such recipient shall be entitled to receive the greater amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

Increases in federal benefits under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act for reasons other than cost of living which are not accompanied by an increase in federal benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act shall be added to the payment schedules as set forth in Section 12200, excluding subdivision (h), in accordance with the following method: The amount of the increase in the federal monthly benefit level shall be multiplied by the number of recipients who will benefit therefrom and the resultant amount divided by the total number of recipients eligible for assistance under the provisions of this chapter at the time the increases are to go into effect, and the quotient rounded to the nearest dollar. This amount shall determine the increase in the aforementioned payment schedules.

Subsequent to the first increase pursuant to this section, each additional increase in the Title XVI federal benefit levels added to the payment schedules of Section 12200, excepting subdivision (h), shall be based on the difference between the federal benefit levels immediately applicable prior to an increase thereto and the federal benefit levels immediately applicable thereafter.

The director shall notify the Secretary of the United States Department of Health, Education and Welfare of the amount of the increases to be added pursuant to this section to the payment schedules in Section 12200, no later than 15 working days following the date on which the director is notified by the secretary in writing of the amounts of the increases to federal benefits.

This section shall be suspended for the period from July 1 through December 31, 1983, and on January 1, 1984, shall become operative again.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 116.1.   Effective July 21, 1983.   Note: This amendment suspended the operation of this section from July 1, 1983, until Jan. 1, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Services [12250. - 12254.]

12250.

The intent of this article and Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of this chapter is to maintain a state system of a broad range of social services, including rehabilitation services, to assist aged, blind or disabled persons under this chapter attain or retain the capabilities of maintaining or achieving self-care, economic independence, personal well-being, rehabilitation or a sound family life. Such services may be provided to former or potential recipients of aid.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

12251.

As used in this article, and Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300), the term “social services” includes in-home supportive services, protective services, and children’s out-of-home care services as such services are defined by the department in order to secure maximum federal financial participation. Availability of these services shall be based upon the eligibility criteria set forth by the department and shall include, at a minimum, provision for eligibility based on income and linkage to other public assistance programs. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting eligibility for protective services and children’s out-of-home care services on the basis of income and linkage to other public assistance programs, to the extent these services are not presently limited on these bases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 35.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12252.

The department shall prepare and submit to the secretary a state plan for social services to the aged, blind and disabled that meets the requirements of the Social Security Act, the purposes of this article, and that will, together with the state plan for services to needy families, fully utilize and distribute the total federal allocation of funds for social services under the public assistance programs for any fiscal year pursuant to Section 15156. Such a plan shall include all the services listed in Section 12251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

12253.

The department and the State Department of Rehabilitation shall jointly develop plans for the orderly processing of cases referred to the State Department of Rehabilitation for a determination of feasibility and planning for vocational rehabilitation.

To the extent permitted by federal law the State Department of Rehabilitation shall provide vocational rehabilitation services approved under the Vocational Rehabilitation Act to every individual referred pursuant to Section 1615 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act. The State Department of Rehabilitation may contract with individual counties to provide such services.

Vocational rehabilitation services provided under this section shall be financed, to the extent possible, under Section 1615(b) of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act and shall be limited to the amounts appropriated for such purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

12254.

Funding of this article is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235.   Note: Repeal conditions in Sec. 14 of Ch. 1235 failed.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. In-Home Supportive Services [12300. - 12318.]

12300.

(a) The purpose of this article is to provide in every county, in a manner consistent with this chapter and the annual Budget Act, those supportive services identified in this section to aged, blind, or disabled persons, as defined under this chapter, who are unable to perform the services themselves and who cannot safely remain in their homes or abodes of their own choosing unless these services are provided.

(b) Supportive services shall include domestic services and services related to domestic services, heavy cleaning, personal care services, accompaniment by a provider when needed during necessary travel to health-related appointments or to alternative resource sites, yard hazard abatement, protective supervision, teaching and demonstration directed at reducing the need for other supportive services, and paramedical services that make it possible for the recipient to establish and maintain an independent living arrangement.

(c) Personal care services shall mean all of the following:

(1) Assistance with ambulation.

(2) Bathing, oral hygiene, and grooming.

(3) Dressing.

(4) Care and assistance with prosthetic devices.

(5) Bowel, bladder, and menstrual care.

(6) Repositioning, skin care, range of motion exercises, and
 transfers.

(7) Feeding and assurance of adequate fluid intake.

(8) Respiration.

(9) Assistance with self-administration of medications.

(d) Personal care services are available if these services are provided in the beneficiary’s home and other locations as may be authorized by the director. Among the locations that may be authorized by the director under this subdivision is the recipient’s place of employment if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The personal care services are limited to those services that are currently authorized for a recipient in the recipient’s home and those services are to be utilized by the recipient at the recipient’s place of employment to enable the recipient to obtain, retain, or return to work. Authorized services utilized by the recipient at the recipient’s place of employment shall be services that are relevant and necessary in supporting and maintaining employment. However, workplace services shall not be used to supplant any reasonable accommodations required of an employer by the
 federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.; ADA) or other legal entitlements or third-party obligations.

(2) The provision of personal care services at the recipient’s place of employment shall be authorized only to the extent that the total hours utilized at the workplace are within the total personal care services hours authorized for the recipient in the home. Additional personal care services hours may not be authorized in connection with a recipient’s employment.

(e) When supportive services are
 provided to a minor, the provider of supportive services shall be paid only for the following:

(1) Services related to domestic services.

(2) Personal care services.

(3) Accompaniment by a provider when needed during necessary travel to
 health-related appointments or to alternative resource sites.

(4) Protective supervision only as needed because of the functional limitations of the child.

(5) Paramedical services.

(f) The policy changes made to minor provider eligibility guidelines in subdivision (e) by the act that added this subdivision shall take effect 60 days after the State Department of Social Services issues policy guidance and, if needed, fiscal guidance through all-county letter or similar written instructions. 

(g) To encourage maximum voluntary services, so as to reduce governmental costs, respite care shall also be provided. Respite care is temporary or periodic service for eligible recipients to relieve persons who are providing care without compensation.

(h) A person who is eligible to receive a service or services under an approved federal waiver authorized pursuant to Section 14132.951, or a person who is eligible to receive a service or services authorized pursuant to Section 14132.95, shall not be eligible to receive the same service or services pursuant to this article. If the waiver authorized pursuant to Section 14132.951, as approved by the federal government, does not extend eligibility to all persons otherwise eligible for services under this article, or does not cover a service or particular services, or does not cover the scope of a service that a person would otherwise be eligible to receive under this article, those persons who are not
 eligible for services, or for a particular service under the waiver or Section 14132.95, shall be eligible for services under this article.

(i) A person who is eligible for state-only funded full-scope Medi-Cal benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000), and who meets all other applicable eligibility criteria for receiving services under this article, shall be eligible for services available under this article.

(j) (1) All services provided pursuant to this article shall be equal in amount, scope, and duration to the same services provided pursuant to Section 14132.95, including any adjustments that may be made to those services pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14132.95.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the rate of reimbursement for in-home supportive services provided through any mode of service shall not exceed the rate of reimbursement established under subdivision (j) of Section 14132.95 for the same mode of service unless otherwise provided in the annual Budget Act.

(3) The maximum number of hours available under Section 14132.95, Section 14132.951, and this section, combined, shall be 283 hours per month. Any recipient of services under this article shall receive no more than the applicable maximum specified in Section 12303.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 55.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.1.

As used in Section 12300 and in this article, “supportive services” include those necessary paramedical services that are ordered by a licensed health care professional who is lawfully authorized to do so, which persons could provide for themselves but for their functional limitations. Paramedical services include the administration of medications, puncturing the skin or inserting a medical device into a body orifice, activities requiring sterile procedures, or other activities requiring judgment based on training given by a licensed health care professional.
 These necessary services shall be rendered by a provider under the direction of a licensed health care professional, subject to the informed consent of the recipient obtained as a part of the order for service. Any and all references to Section 12300 in any statute heretofore or hereafter enacted shall be deemed to be references to this section. All statutory references to the supportive services specified in Section 12300 shall be deemed to include paramedical services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 939, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.2.

In any in-home supportive services action concerning the amount of in-home supportive services to be provided, the department shall send a notice of the action to each recipient. The recipient shall also receive a description of each specific task authorized and the number of hours allotted. In the case of reassessment, the recipient shall receive an identification of hours for tasks increased or reduced and the difference from previous hours authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 116.5.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

12300.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, “authorized representative” means an individual who is designated in writing, on a form developed by the department, by an applicant for or recipient of in-home supportive services pursuant to this article, to accompany, assist, and represent the applicant or recipient for purposes related to the program, including, but not limited to, the application process, direction of services, and redetermination of eligibility.

(b) An applicant or recipient may designate an individual to act as his or her authorized representative for the purposes described in subdivision (a) on a form that does all of the following:

(1) Specifies an effective time period, to be determined by the department.

(2) Specifies the responsibilities to be performed by the authorized representative.

(3) May be revoked or changed by the applicant or recipient at any time.

(c) The authorized representative designation pursuant to this section shall not authorize representation for an administrative hearing conducted by the department. An
 applicant or recipient shall comply with Section 10950 to designate an authorized representative for the purposes of an administrative hearing.

(d) The authorized representative shall have the responsibility to act in the applicant or recipient’s best interest, shall not have any other power to act on behalf of the applicant or recipient, except as specified in writing pursuant to this section, and shall not act in lieu of the applicant or recipient.

(e) (1) An applicant or recipient who has a legal representative with the legal authority to act on behalf of the applicant or recipient that includes decisionmaking authority for purposes reasonably believed to be related to the program, as described in subdivision (a), shall not be required to complete an authorized representative
 form, except for the purpose specified in subdivision (g).

(2) A legal representative may designate an authorized representative for the applicant or recipient in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a legal representative shall include both of the following:

(A) A court-appointed guardian or conservator.

(B) For an applicant or recipient who is a minor, a parent or other individual determined by the county human services agency to be the legally authorized decisionmaker for the applicant or recipient.

(f) (1) The following
 individuals shall not serve as an authorized representative for an applicant or recipient:

(A) An individual who is prevented from being a provider of services pursuant to Section 12305.81.

(B) An individual who is prevented from being a provider of services pursuant to Section 12305.87.

(2) The prohibitions described in paragraph (1) shall not apply to an individual described in subdivision (e).

(g) An authorized representative may sign timesheets or other provider-related documents for in-home supportive services on behalf of the recipient, if specified by the recipient on the authorized representative form. Notwithstanding any other law, an authorized
 representative who is a provider of services for the recipient may not sign his or her own timesheet on behalf of the recipient unless the authorized representative is an individual specified in subdivision (e). For administrative processing purposes, a legal representative specified in subdivision (e) shall complete an authorized representative form to sign timesheets or other provider-related documents for in-home supportive services on behalf of the recipient.

(h) (1) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, representatives of applicants for and recipients of services under this article, and representatives of providers of services under this article, shall develop a standardized statewide form and procedures for
 effectuating the designation of an authorized representative pursuant to this section.

(2) The standard agreement form shall include a notification regarding the requirements of this subdivision and a statement that by signing the agreement, the individual designated as an authorized representative agrees to abide by those requirements.

(i) When an applicant or recipient designates an authorized representative on the authorized representative form, the county shall retain the original form in the applicant or recipient’s in-home supportive services case file. The form may be electronically retained. The county shall provide copies of the form to the applicant or recipient and to the individual designated as the authorized representative.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. The department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing these provisions no later than July 1, 2016. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(2) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the